apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="toč/ka__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ko</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- More than one pl.gen, see http://hjp.srce.hr/index.php?show=kosi_oblici&id=f19nURB9 -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kama</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kama</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kama</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="žen/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zvezd/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vođ/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vođa"><i>vođ</i><par n="vođ/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="granica"><i>granic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="država"><i>držav</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zemlja"><i>zemlj</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cigareta"><i>cigaret</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grupa"><i>grup</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lebdjelica"><i>lebdjelic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plaža"><i>plaž</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luka"><i>luk</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ulica"><i>ulic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voda"><i>vod</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zračna luka"><i>zračna<b/>luk</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kafa"><i>kaf</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kava"><i>kav</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kahva" r="LR"><i>kahv</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stolica"><i>stolic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rakija"><i>rakij</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="partija"><i>partij</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žena"><i>žen</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knjižara"><i>knjižar</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="točka"><i>toč</i><par n="toč/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tačka"><i>tač</i><par n="toč/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="igračka"><i>igrač</i><par n="toč/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="građevina"><i>građevin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="planina"><i>planin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duša"><i>duš</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="životinja"><i>životinj</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prijateljica"><i>prijateljic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adresa"><i>adres</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knjižnica"><i>knjižnic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roba"><i>rob</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pošta"><i>pošt</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minuta"><i>minut</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="godina"><i>godin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mandarina"><i>mandarin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žena"><i>žen</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="govedina"><i>govedin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kemija"><i>kemij</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baka"><i>bak</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oluja"><i>oluj</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rupa"><i>rup</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haljina"><i>haljin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imenica"><i>imenic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zima"><i>zim</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvornica"><i>tvornic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrana"><i>elektran</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="istina"><i>istin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rečenica"><i>rečenic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="večera"><i>večer</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="površina"><i>površin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stranica"><i>stranic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sloboda"><i>slobod</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="osoba"><i>osob</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knjižara"><i>knjižar</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="subota"><i>subot</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abeceda"><i>abeced</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šljiva"><i>šljiv</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carina"><i>carin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="burza"><i>burz</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šahovnica"><i>šahovnic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banana"><i>banan</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baba"><i>bab</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trava"><i>trav</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ljekarna"><i>ljekarn</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koma"><i>kom</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="količina"><i>količin</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beba"><i>beb</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soba"><i>sob</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boja"><i>boj</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lekcija"><i>lekcij</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kobasica"><i>kobasic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bolnica"><i>bolnic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kosilica"><i>kosilic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krivica"><i>krivic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glava"><i>glav</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuhinja"><i>kuhinj</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grupa"><i>grup</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="policija"><i>policij</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="činjenica"><i>činjenic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
